Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) The Jurisdictional Transfer Advisory Committee is  established within the
Department of Transportation.
(2) The committee consists of  11 members appointed by the Governor. The members of
the committee shall include:
(a) Two members who are transportation engineers;
(b) Two members who represent cities and who have experience working  on transporta-
tion projects;
(c) One member  who represents a county and who has experience working on transpor-
tation projects;
(d) One  member who represents a regional government and who has experience working
on transportation projects;
(e) One member who represents road users;
(f) One member who represents law enforcement;
(g) One member who represents transit users;
(h) One member who represents the advisory committee on bicycle traffic established  in
ORS 366.112; and
(i) One member who represents the Transportation Safety Committee established in ORS
802.300.
(3) The Governor shall appoint members to  the Jurisdictional Transfer Advisory Com-
mittee so that there is at least one member of the committee from each congressional  dis-
trict in this state.
(4) The Jurisdictional Transfer Advisory Committee shall, from the jurisdictional transfer
applications submitted under section 3 of this 2023 Act:
(a) Review the applications; and
(b) Develop a list of three jurisdictional transfers to recommend for funding.
(5) The committee shall actively solicit reviews and comments from the Oregon Trans-
portation Commission in  the development of the list described in subsection (4)(b) of this
section. The committee shall also shall take into consideration the following:
Enrolled House Bill 2793 (HB 2793-B) Page 1
(a) The difference between the applicant’s and the  department’s standards of mainte-
nance;
(b) The amount of deferred maintenance;
(c) A description of how the highway is used in the community;
(d) The climate impact of a transfer and subsequent upgrades the applicant could provide;
(e) The potential positive impacts on historically underserved groups;
(f) The increase in multimodal transportation options provided by a transfer;
(g) A description of the safety issues that exist; and
(h) A transfer readiness assessment that may include:
(A) The interest of the community;
(B) Funding capacity of the applicant for  the transfer and maintenance in the future; and
(C) The existing condition of the highway and its current state of maintenance.
(6) No later than September 15 of each even-numbered year, the  Jurisdictional Transfer
Advisory Committee shall submit a report to the Joint Committee on Transportation,  in the
manner provided in ORS 192.245, that  includes the list of jurisdictional transfers recom-
mended for funding under subsection (4)(b) of this section.
(7) The term of office of each member of the Jurisdictional  Transfer Advisory Committee
is four  years, but a member serves at the pleasure of the Governor. Before the expiration
of the term of a member,  the Governor shall appoint a successor whose term begins on
January 1 next following. A member is eligible for reappointment. However, a member of  the
committee may not serve more than two terms. If there is  a vacancy for any cause, the
Governor shall make an appointment to become immediately effective for  the unexpired
term. When a vacancy occurs in an appointment made from a congressional district, the
successor shall be appointed from the congressional district for which the vacancy exists.
(8) A majority of the members of the committee constitutes a quorum for the trans-
action of business.
(9) Official action by the committee requires the approval of a  majority of the members
of the committee.
(10) The committee shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(11) The committee shall meet at  times and places specified by the call of the chairperson
or of a majority  of the members of the committee, provided that the committee meets at
least four times a year.
(12) The committee may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the committee.
(13) The  Department of Transportation shall provide assistance and space for meetings
as requested by the chair of the committee.
(14) Qualified members, as defined in ORS 292.495, of the advisory committee are entitled
to compensation for actual and necessary travel or other expenses incurred  in the perform-
ance of their official duties as specified for qualified members of boards  or commissions in
ORS 292.495 (4).
SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding the term of office  specified by section 1 of this 2023 Act,
of the members first appointed by the Governor to the Jurisdictional  Transfer Advisory
Committee:
(1) Two shall serve for a term ending January 1, 2025.
(2) Three shall serve for a term ending January 1, 2026.
(3) Three shall serve for a term ending January 1, 2027.
(4) Three shall serve for a term ending January 1, 2028.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Department of Transportation shall adopt rules specifying  the proc-
ess by which a city  or county may apply for inclusion on the list of jurisdictional transfers
recommended for funding and submitted to  the Joint Committee on Transportation under
section 1 of this 2023 Act.
(2) An application under this section must be on a form prescribed  by the department
and must include the following:
Enrolled House Bill 2793 (HB 2793-B) Page 2
(a) The name of the city or county;
(b) A description of the portion of the highway to be transferred;
(c) A desired timeline for the transfer;
(d) The scope of the transfer;
(e) A description of which body assumes liability during and after the transfer;
(f) The cost to update the segment of highway transferred to a state of good repair; and
(g) Any other information necessary or helpful to the  Jurisdictional Transfer Advisory
Committee established in section 1 of this 2023  Act in making its recommendations to the
Joint Committee on Transportation.
(3) A jurisdictional transfer applicant must submit:
(a) Plans to provide at least 20 percent of the moneys required for  the jurisdictional
transfer; and
(b) A community vision plan that describes the  applicant’s plan for managing and im-
proving the highway.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 802.348 is amended to read:
802.348. (1) The Department of  Transportation shall ensure that the membership of advisory
committees to the department reflects the racial and ethnic and ability composition of this state  as
determined by the most recent  American Community Survey from the United States Census Bureau.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section  applies to all advisory committees to the department, including
but not limited to:
(a) The Continuous Improvement Advisory Committee established in ORS 184.665.
(b) The Freight Advisory Committee established in ORS 366.212.
(c) The Road User Fee Task Force established in ORS 184.843.
(d) Any stakeholder forum established under ORS 366.215.
(e) The advisory committee on vehicle dealer regulation established in ORS 802.370.
(f) The advisory committee on bicycle traffic established in ORS 366.112.
(g) The Transportation Safety Committee established in ORS 802.300.
(h) The Jurisdictional Transfer Advisory Committee established in section 1 of this  2023
Act.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 802.348, as amended by section 4 of this 2023 Act, is amended to read:
802.348. (1) The Department of Transportation shall ensure that  the membership of advisory
committees  to  the department reflects the racial and ethnic and ability composition of this state as
determined by the most recent  American Community Survey from the United States Census Bureau.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section  applies to all advisory committees to the department, including
but not limited to:
(a) The Continuous Improvement Advisory Committee established in ORS 184.665.
(b) The Freight Advisory Committee established in ORS 366.212.
(c) The Road User Fee Task Force established in ORS 184.843.
(d) Any stakeholder forum established under ORS 366.215.
(e) The advisory committee on vehicle dealer regulation established in ORS 802.370.
(f) The advisory committee on bicycle traffic established in ORS 366.112.
(g) The Transportation Safety Committee established in ORS 802.300.
[(h) The Jurisdictional Transfer Advisory Committee established in section 1 of this 2023 Act. ]
SECTION 6.
The amendments to ORS 802.348 by  section 5 of this 2023 Act become oper-
ative on January 1, 2029.
SECTION 7. Sections 1, 2 and 3 of this 2023 Act are repealed on January 2, 2029.
SECTION 8. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 2 (3),  chapter , Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House
Bill 5040), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of
expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and  federal
funds received as reimbursement from the United States  Department of Transportation, but
excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2  (3), chapter ,
Enrolled House Bill 2793 (HB 2793-B) Page 3
Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled  House Bill 5040), collected or received by the Department of
Transportation, for project delivery and support, is increased by $220,568.
SECTION 9. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House June 14, 2023
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 23, 2023
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2793 (HB 2793-B) Page 4